Florida, session 2026, SB380.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 37 38 Section 1.âSection 50.0311, Florida Statutes, is amended to 39 read: 40 50.0311âPublication of advertisements and public notices on 41 a publicly accessible website and governmental access channels.â 42 (1)âFor purposes of this chapter, the term âgovernmental 43 agencyâ means a county, municipality, school board, clerk of the 44 circuit court, tax collector, water management district 45 operating pursuant to chapter 373, or other unit of local 46 government or political subdivision in this state. 47 (2)âFor purposes of notices and advertisements required 48 under s. 50.011, the term âpublicly accessible websiteâ means a 49 countyâs official website or other private website designated by 50 the county for the publication of legal notices and 51 advertisements which that is accessible through via the 52 Internet. For legal notices and advertisements required under s. 53 50.011 by a municipality, clerk of the circuit court, tax 54 collector, or water management district, the term âpublicly 55 accessible websiteâ means such entityâs official website, a 56 private website designated by such entity, a countyâs official 57 website, or a private website designated by the county in which 58 such entity is located. 59 (3)âAll advertisements and public notices published on a 60 website as provided in this chapter must be in searchable form 61 and indicate the date on which the advertisement or public 62 notice was first published on the website. 63 (4)âAny legal notice or advertisement that is published on 64 a publicly accessible website must, unless otherwise specified 65 by law, be published continuously for at least 2 weeks when the 66 purpose is to provide notice of the status of a government 67 activity or be published continuously from the date of initial 68 publication through the date of the proposed event or activity. 69 (5)(3)âA governmental agency may use the publicly 70 accessible website of the county in which it lies to publish 71 legally required advertisements and public notices if the cost 72 of publishing advertisements and public notices on such website 73 is less than the cost of publishing advertisements and public 74 notices in a newspaper. 75 (6)(4)âA governmental agency with at least 75 percent of 76 its population located within a county having with a population 77 of less fewer than 160,000; a municipality, school board, clerk 78 of the circuit court, or tax collector that is located within a 79 county having a population of less than 160,000; or any other 80 unit of local government or political subdivision in this state 81 having at least 75 percent of its population located within a 82 county having a population of less than 160,000 may use a 83 publicly accessible website to publish legally required 84 advertisements and public notices only if the governing body of 85 the governmental agency, at a public hearing that has been 86 noticed in a newspaper as provided in this chapter, determines 87 that the residents of the governmental agency have sufficient 88 access to the Internet by broadband service, as defined in s. 89 364.02, or by any other means, such that publishing 90 advertisements and public notices on a publicly accessible 91 website will not unreasonably restrict public access. 92 (7)(5)âA special district spanning the geographic 93 boundaries of more than one county that satisfies the criteria 94 for publishing and publishes chooses to publish legally required 95 advertisements and public notices on a publicly accessible 96 website must publish such advertisements and public notices on 97 the publicly accessible website of each county it spans. For 98 purposes of this subsection, the term âspecial districtâ has the 99 same meaning as in s. 189.012 but does not include a water 100 management district operating pursuant to chapter 373. 101 (8)(6)âA governmental agency that uses a publicly 102 accessible website to publish legally required advertisements 103 and public notices must shall provide notice at least once per 104 year in a newspaper of general circulation or another 105 publication that is mailed or delivered to all residents and 106 property owners throughout the governmentâs jurisdiction, 107 indicating that property owners and residents may receive 108 legally required advertisements and public notices from the 109 governmental agency by first-class mail or e-mail upon 110 registering their name and address or e-mail address with the 111 governmental agency. The governmental agency must shall maintain 112 a registry of names, addresses, and e-mail addresses of property 113 owners and residents who have requested in writing that they 114 receive legally required advertisements and public notices from 115 the governmental agency by first-class mail or e-mail. 116 (9)(7)âA link to advertisements and public notices 117 published on a publicly accessible website must shall be 118 conspicuously placed: 119 (a)âOn the websiteâs homepage or on a page accessible 120 through a direct link from the homepage. 121 (b)âOn the homepage of the website of each governmental 122 agency publishing notices on the publicly accessible website or 123 on a page accessible through a direct link from the homepage. 124 (10)(8)âA governmental agency that has a governmental 125 access channel authorized under s. 610.109 may also include on 126 its governmental access channel a summary of all advertisements 127 and public notices that are published on a publicly accessible 128 website. 129 (11)(9)âA public bid advertisement made by a governmental 130 agency on a publicly accessible website must include a method to 131 accept electronic bids. 132 Section 2.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 133 made by this act to section 50.0311, Florida Statutes, in a 134 reference thereto, section 11.02, Florida Statutes, is reenacted 135 to read: 136 11.02âNotice of special or local legislation or certain 137 relief acts.âThe notice required to obtain special or local 138 legislation or any relief act specified in s. 11.065 shall be by 139 publishing the identical notice as provided in chapter 50 or 140 circulated throughout the county or counties where the matter or 141 thing to be affected by such legislation shall be situated one 142 time at least 30 days before introduction of the proposed law 143 into the Legislature or, if the notice is not published on a 144 publicly accessible website as provided in s. 50.0311 and there 145 is no newspaper circulated throughout or published in the 146 county, by posting for at least 30 days at not fewer than three 147 public places in the county or each of the counties, one of 148 which places shall be at the courthouse in the county or 149 counties where the matter or thing to be affected by such 150 legislation shall be situated. Notice of special or local 151 legislation shall state the substance of the contemplated law, 152 as required by s. 10, Art. III of the State Constitution. Notice 153 of any relief act specified in s. 11.065 shall state the name of 154 the claimant, the nature of the injury or loss for which the 155 claim is made, and the amount of the claim against the affected 156 municipalityâs revenue-sharing trust fund. 157 Section 3.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 158 made by this act to section 50.0311, Florida Statutes, in a 159 reference thereto, subsection (2) of section 45.031, Florida 160 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 161 45.031âJudicial sales procedure.âIn any sale of real or 162 personal property under an order or judgment, the procedures 163 provided in this section and ss. 45.0315-45.035 may be followed 164 as an alternative to any other sale procedure if so ordered by 165 the court. 166 (2)âPUBLICATION OF SALE.âNotice of sale shall be published 167 on a publicly accessible website as provided in s. 50.0311 for 168 at least 2 consecutive weeks before the sale or once a week for 169 2 consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation, as 170 provided in chapter 50, published in the county where the sale 171 is to be held. The second publication by newspaper shall be at 172 least 5 days before the sale. The notice shall contain: 173 (a)âA description of the property to be sold. 174 (b)âThe time and place of sale. 175 (c)âA statement that the sale will be made pursuant to the 176 order or final judgment. 177 (d)âThe caption of the action. 178 (e)âThe name of the clerk making the sale. 179 (f)âA statement that any person claiming an interest in the 180 surplus from the sale, if any, other than the property owner as 181 of the date of the lis pendens must file a claim before the 182 clerk reports the surplus as unclaimed. 183 184 The court, in its discretion, may enlarge the time of the sale. 185 Notice of the changed time of sale shall be published as 186 provided herein. 187 Section 4.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 188 made by this act to section 50.0311, Florida Statutes, in a 189 reference thereto, subsection (2) of section 50.011, Florida 190 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 191 50.011âPublication of legal notices.âWhenever by statute an 192 official or legal advertisement or a publication or notice in a 193 newspaper or on a governmental agency website has been or is 194 directed or permitted in the nature of or in lieu of process, or 195 for constructive service, or in initiating, assuming, reviewing, 196 exercising, or enforcing jurisdiction or power, or for any 197 purpose, including all legal notices and advertisements of 198 sheriffs and tax collectors, such legislation, whether existing 199 or repealed, means either of the following: 200 (2)âA publication on a publicly accessible website under s. 201 50.0311. 202 Section 5.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 203 made by this act to section 50.0311, Florida Statutes, in a 204 reference thereto, subsection (12) of section 90.902, Florida 205 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 206 90.902âSelf-authentication.âExtrinsic evidence of 207 authenticity as a condition precedent to admissibility is not 208 required for: 209 (12)âA legal notice published in accordance with the 210 requirements of chapter 50 in the print edition of a qualified 211 newspaper or on a publicly accessible website as provided in s. 212 50.0311. 213 Section 6.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 214 made by this act to section 50.0311, Florida Statutes, in a 215 reference thereto, paragraph (d) of subsection (1) of section 216 120.81, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 217 120.81âExceptions and special requirements; general areas.â 218 (1)âEDUCATIONAL UNITS.â 219 (d)âNotwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, 220 educational units shall not be required to include the full text 221 of the rule or rule amendment in notices relating to rules and 222 need not publish these or other notices in the Florida 223 Administrative Register, but notice shall be made: 224 1.âBy publication in a newspaper qualified under chapter 50 225 in the affected area or on a publicly accessible website as 226 provided in s. 50.0311; 227 2.âBy mail to all persons who have made requests of the 228 educational unit for advance notice of its proceedings and to 229 organizations representing persons affected by the proposed 230 rule; and 231 3.âBy posting in appropriate places so that those 232 particular classes of persons to whom the intended action is 233 directed may be duly notified. 234 Section 7.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 235 made by this act to section 50.0311, Florida Statutes, in 236 references thereto, paragraphs (b) and (h) of subsection (1) of 237 section 121.055, Florida Statutes, are reenacted to read: 238 121.055âSenior Management Service Class.âThere is hereby 239 established a separate class of membership within the Florida 240 Retirement System to be known as the âSenior Management Service 241 Class,â which shall become effective February 1, 1987. 242 (1) 243 (b)1.âExcept as provided in subparagraph 2., effective 244 January 1, 1990, participation in the Senior Management Service 245 Class is compulsory for the president of each community college, 246 the manager of each participating municipality or county, and 247 all appointed district school superintendents. Effective January 248 1, 1994, additional positions may be designated for inclusion in 249 the Senior Management Service Class if: 250 a.âPositions to be included in the class are designated by 251 the local agency employer. Notice of intent to designate 252 positions for inclusion in the class must be published for at 253 least 2 consecutive weeks if published on a publicly accessible 254 website as provided in s. 50.0311 or, if published in print, 255 once a week for 2 consecutive weeks in a newspaper qualified 256 under chapter 50 that is published in the county or counties 257 affected. 258 b.âUp to 10 nonelective full-time positions may be 259 designated for each local agency employer reporting to the 260 department; for local agencies with 100 or more regularly 261 established positions, additional nonelective full-time 262 positions may be designated, not to exceed 1 percent of the 263 regularly established positions within the agency. 264 c.âEach position added to the class must be a managerial or 265 policymaking position filled by an employee who is not subject 266 to continuing contract and serves at the pleasure of the local 267 agency employer without civil service protection, and who: 268 (I)âHeads an organizational unit; or 269 (II)âHas responsibility to effect or recommend personnel, 270 budget, expenditure, or policy decisions in his or her areas of 271 responsibility. 272 2.âIn lieu of participation in the Senior Management 273 Service Class, members of the Senior Management Service Class, 274 pursuant to subparagraph 1., may withdraw from the Florida 275 Retirement System altogether. The decision to withdraw from the 276 system is irrevocable as long as the employee holds the 277 position. Any service creditable under the Senior Management 278 Service Class shall be retained after the member withdraws from 279 the system; however, additional service credit in the Senior 280 Management Service Class may not be earned after such 281 withdrawal. Such members are not eligible to participate in the 282 Senior Management Service Optional Annuity Program. 283 3.âEffective January 1, 2006, through June 30, 2006, an 284 employee who has withdrawn from the Florida Retirement System 285 under subparagraph 2. has one opportunity to elect to 286 participate in the pension plan or the investment plan. 287 a.âIf the employee elects to participate in the investment 288 plan, membership shall be prospective, and the applicable 289 provisions of s. 121.4501(4) govern the election. 290 b.âIf the employee elects to participate in the pension 291 plan, the employee shall, upon payment to the system trust fund 292 of the amount calculated under sub-sub-subparagraph (I), receive 293 service credit for prior service based upon the time during 294 which the employee had withdrawn from the system. 295 (I)âThe cost for such credit shall be an amount 296 representing the actuarial accrued liability for the affected 297 period of service. The cost shall be calculated using the 298 discount rate and other relevant actuarial assumptions that were 299 used to value the pension plan liabilities in the most recent 300 actuarial valuation. The calculation must include any service 301 already maintained under the pension plan in addition to the 302 period of withdrawal. The actuarial accrued liability 303 attributable to any service already maintained under the pension 304 plan shall be applied as a credit to the total cost resulting 305 from the calculation. The division must ensure that the transfer 306 sum is prepared using a formula and methodology certified by an 307 actuary. 308 (II)âThe employee must transfer a sum representing the net 309 cost owed for the actuarial accrued liability in sub-sub 310 subparagraph (I) immediately following the time of such 311 movement, determined assuming that attained service equals the 312 sum of service in the pension plan and the period of withdrawal. 313 (h)1.âExcept as provided in subparagraph 3., effective 314 January 1, 1994, participation in the Senior Management Service 315 Class shall be compulsory for the State Courts Administrator and 316 the Deputy State Courts Administrators, the Clerk of the Supreme 317 Court, the Marshal of the Supreme Court, the Executive Director 318 of the Justice Administrative Commission, the capital collateral 319 regional counsel, the clerks of the district courts of appeals, 320 the marshals of the district courts of appeals, and the trial 321 court administrator and the Chief Deputy Court Administrator in 322 each judicial circuit. Effective January 1, 1994, additional 323 positions in the offices of the state attorney and public 324 defender in each judicial circuit may be designated for 325 inclusion in the Senior Management Service Class of the Florida 326 Retirement System, provided that: 327 a.âPositions to be included in the class shall be 328 designated by the state attorney or public defender, as 329 appropriate. Notice of intent to designate positions for 330 inclusion in the class shall be published for at least 2 331 consecutive weeks on a publicly accessible website as provided 332 in s. 50.0311 or, if published in print, once a week for 2 333 consecutive weeks in a newspaper qualified under chapter 50 in 334 the county or counties affected. 335 b.âOne nonelective full-time position may be designated for 336 each state attorney and public defender reporting to the 337 Department of Management Services; for agencies with 200 or more 338 regularly established positions under the state attorney or 339 public defender, additional nonelective full-time positions may 340 be designated, not to exceed 0.5 percent of the regularly 341 established positions within the agency. 342 c.âEach position added to the class must be a managerial or 343 policymaking position filled by an employee who serves at the 344 pleasure of the state attorney or public defender without civil 345 service protection, and who: 346 (I)âHeads an organizational unit; or 347 (II)âHas responsibility to effect or recommend personnel, 348 budget, expenditure, or policy decisions in his or her areas of 349 responsibility. 350 2.âParticipation in this class shall be compulsory, except 351 as provided in subparagraph 3., for any judicial employee who 352 holds a position designated for coverage in the Senior 353 Management Service Class, and such participation shall continue 354 until the employee terminates employment in a covered position. 355 Effective January 1, 2001, participation in this class is 356 compulsory for assistant state attorneys, assistant statewide 357 prosecutors, assistant public defenders, and assistant capital 358 collateral regional counsel. Effective January 1, 2002, 359 participation in this class is compulsory for assistant 360 attorneys general. 361 3.âIn lieu of participation in the Senior Management 362 Service Class, such members, excluding assistant state 363 attorneys, assistant public defenders, assistant statewide 364 prosecutors, assistant attorneys general, and assistant capital 365 collateral regional counsel, may participate in the Senior 366 Management Service Optional Annuity Program as established in 367 subsection (6). 368 Section 8.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 369 made by this act to section 50.0311, Florida Statutes, in a 370 reference thereto, paragraph (a) of subsection (2) of section 371 162.12, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 372 162.12âNotices.â 373 (2)âIn addition to providing notice as set forth in 374 subsection (1), at the option of the code enforcement board or 375 the local government, notice may be served by publication or 376 posting, as follows: 377 (a)1.âSuch notice shall be published in print in a 378 newspaper or on a publicly accessible website as provided in s. 379 50.0311 for 4 consecutive weeks. If published in print, the 380 notice shall be published once during each week for 4 381 consecutive weeks (four publications being sufficient) in a 382 newspaper in the county where the code enforcement board is 383 located. The newspaper shall meet such requirements as are 384 prescribed under chapter 50 for legal and official 385 advertisements. 386 2.âProof of publication shall be made as provided in ss. 387 50.041 and 50.051. 388 Section 9.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 389 made by this act to section 50.0311, Florida Statutes, in a 390 reference thereto, paragraph (d) of subsection (1) of section 391 190.005, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 392 190.005âEstablishment of district.â 393 (1)âThe exclusive and uniform method for the establishment 394 of a community development district with a size of 2,500 acres 395 or more shall be pursuant to a rule, adopted under chapter 120 396 by the Florida Land and Water Adjudicatory Commission, granting 397 a petition for the establishment of a community development 398 district. 399 (d)âA local public hearing on the petition shall be 400 conducted by a hearing officer in conformance with the 401 applicable requirements and procedures of the Administrative 402 Procedure Act. The hearing shall include oral and written 403 comments on the petition pertinent to the factors specified in 404 paragraph (e). The hearing shall be held at an accessible 405 location in the county in which the community development 406 district is to be located. The petitioner shall cause a notice 407 of the hearing to be published for 4 successive weeks on a 408 publicly accessible website as provided in s. 50.0311 or, if 409 published in print, in a newspaper at least once a week for the 410 4 successive weeks immediately prior to the hearing as provided 411 in chapter 50. Such notice shall give the time and place for the 412 hearing, a description of the area to be included in the 413 district, which description shall include a map showing clearly 414 the area to be covered by the district, and any other relevant 415 information which the establishing governing bodies may require. 416 If published in the print edition of a newspaper, the 417 advertisement may not be placed in the portion of the newspaper 418 where legal notices and classified advertisements appear. The 419 advertisement must be published in a newspaper in the county and 420 of general interest and readership in the community pursuant to 421 chapter 50. Whenever possible, the advertisement shall appear in 422 a newspaper that is published at least weekly, unless the only 423 newspaper in the community is published less than weekly. If the 424 notice is published in the print edition of the newspaper, the 425 map must also be included in any online advertisement pursuant 426 to s. 50.0211. All affected units of general-purpose local 427 government and the general public shall be given an opportunity 428 to appear at the hearing and present oral or written comments on 429 the petition. 430 Section 10.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 431 made by this act to section 50.0311, Florida Statutes, in 432 references thereto, paragraph (f) of subsection (2) of section 433 200.065, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 434 200.065âMethod of fixing millage.â 435 (2)âNo millage shall be levied until a resolution or 436 ordinance has been approved by the governing board of the taxing 437 authority which resolution or ordinance must be approved by the 438 taxing authority according to the following procedure: 439 (f)1.âNotwithstanding any provisions of paragraph (c) to 440 the contrary, each school district shall advertise its intent to 441 adopt a tentative budget on a publicly accessible website 442 pursuant to s. 50.0311 or in a newspaper of general circulation 443 pursuant to subsection (3) within 29 days after certification of 444 value pursuant to subsection (1). For the purpose of this 445 paragraph, the term âpublicly accessible websiteâ includes a 446 district school boardâs official website if the school board 447 website satisfies the remaining requirements of s. 50.0311. Not 448 less than 2 days or more than 5 days thereafter, the district 449 shall hold a public hearing on the tentative budget pursuant to 450 the applicable provisions of paragraph (c). In the event of 451 postponement or recess due to a declared state of emergency, the 452 school district may postpone or recess the hearing for up to 7 453 days and shall post a prominent notice at the place of the 454 original hearing showing the date, time, and place where the 455 hearing will be reconvened. The posted notice shall measure not 456 less than 8.5 by 11 inches. The school district shall make every 457 reasonable effort to provide reasonable notification of the 458 continued hearing to the taxpayers. The information must also be 459 posted on the school districtâs website if the district school 460 board uses a different method of advertisement. 461 2.âNotwithstanding any provisions of paragraph (b) to the 462 contrary, each school district shall advise the property 463 appraiser of its recomputed proposed millage rate within 35 days 464 of certification of value pursuant to subsection (1). The 465 recomputed proposed millage rate of the school district shall be 466 considered its proposed millage rate for the purposes of 467 paragraph (b). 468 3.âNotwithstanding any provisions of paragraph (d) to the 469 contrary, each school district shall hold a public hearing to 470 finalize the budget and adopt a millage rate within 80 days of 471 certification of value pursuant to subsection (1), but not 472 earlier than 65 days after certification. The hearing shall be 473 held in accordance with the applicable provisions of paragraph 474 (d), except that a newspaper advertisement need not precede the 475 hearing. 476 Section 11.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 477 made by this act to section 50.0311, Florida Statutes, in a 478 reference thereto, subsection (5) of section 849.38, Florida 479 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 480 849.38âProceedings for forfeiture; notice of seizure and 481 order to show cause.â 482 (5)âIf the value of the property seized is shown by the 483 sheriffâs return to have an appraised value of $1,000 or less, 484 the above citation shall be served by posting at three public 485 places in the county, one of which shall be the front door of 486 the courthouse; if the value of the property is shown by the 487 sheriffâs return to have an approximate value of more than 488 $1,000, the citation shall be published by print or posted for 489 at least 2 consecutive weeks on a publicly accessible website as 490 provided in s. 50.0311. If published in print, the citation 491 shall appear at least once each week for 2 consecutive weeks in 492 a newspaper qualified to publish legal notices under chapter 50 493 that is published in the county, if there is such a newspaper 494 published in the county. If there is no such newspaper, the 495 notice of such publication shall be made by certificate of the 496 clerk if publication is made by posting, and by affidavit as 497 provided in chapter 50, if made by publication as provided in 498 chapter 50, which affidavit or certificate shall be filed and 499 become a part of the record in the cause. Failure of the record 500 to show proof of such publication shall not affect any judgment 501 made in the cause unless it shall affirmatively appear that no 502 such publication was made. 503 Section 12.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 504 made by this act to section 50.0311, Florida Statutes, in a 505 reference thereto, paragraph (c) of subsection (2) of section 506 1001.372, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 507 1001.372âDistrict school board meetings.â 508 (2)âPLACE OF MEETINGS.â 509 (c)âFor the purpose of this section, due public notice 510 shall consist of, at least 2 days prior to the meeting: 511 continuous publication on a publicly accessible website as 512 provided in s. 50.0311 or the official district school board 513 website; publication in a newspaper of general circulation in 514 the county, or in each county where there is no newspaper of 515 general circulation in the county, an announcement over at least 516 one radio station whose signal is generally received in the 517 county, a reasonable number of times daily during the 48 hours 518 immediately preceding the date of such meeting; or posting a 519 notice at the courthouse door if no newspaper is published in 520 the county. 521 Section 13.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 522 made by this act to section 50.0311, Florida Statutes, in a 523 reference thereto, subsection (1) of section 1011.03, Florida 524 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 525 1011.03âPublic hearings; budget to be submitted to 526 Department of Education.â 527 (1)âEach district school board shall cause a summary of its 528 tentative budget, including the proposed millage levies as 529 provided for by law, to be posted on the districtâs official 530 website or on a publicly accessible website as provided in s. 531 50.0311. 532 Section 14.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.